Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 673. VERIFICATION OF EMPLOYEE INFORMATION

Sec. 673.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "E-verify program" means the electronic verification of employment authorization program of the federal Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-208, reprinted in note, 8 U.S.C. Section 1324a), operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security, or a successor employment authorization program designated by the United States Department of Homeland Security or other federal agency authorized to verify the employment authorization status of newly hired employees under the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (8 U.S.C. Section 1101 et seq.).

(2) "State agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 659.101.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (S.B. 374), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 673.002. VERIFICATION. A state agency shall register and participate in the E-verify program to verify information of all new employees.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (S.B. 374), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 673.003. RULES. The Texas Workforce Commission shall adopt rules and prescribe forms to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (S.B. 374), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.